Washington statutes.
RCW 42.08.140

Force of additional bond.

Every such additional bond shall be of like force and obligation upon the principal and sureties therein, and shall subject the officer and his or her sureties to the same liabilities as are prescribed respecting the original bonds of officers.

[ 2012 c 117 s 103; 1890 p 36 s 9; RRS s 9938.]